Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 8 O.S. 2021, Section 143, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 143. In any county of this state, the board of county


commissioners is hereby authorized and empowered to utilize


employees under its jurisdiction and county-owned tools, machinery,


equipment, and materials for the purposes of opening and closing


graves and maintaining and improving any publicly owned cemetery or


other cemetery within the county not owned and maintained by an


individual or private organization; provided, that, there is a


documented and known tribal burial presence, and where appropriate,


a reasonable fee, not to exceed the actual cost of the service, may


be charged for such services.

Req. No. 500 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-500 CAD 1/16/2025 2:58:34 PM











































Req. No. 500 Page 2